Hawaii statutes.
[§465D-4] License required. (a)
Beginning on January 1, 2016, except as specifically provided in this chapter,
no person shall engage in the practice of behavior analysis or use the title
"licensed behavior analyst" or "behavior analyst" without a
valid license issued pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall
be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000 for each separate offense. Each
day of each violation shall constitute a separate offense. [L 2015, c 199, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next